Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-539
Jurisdiction authorized.

A court of this state may exercise jurisdiction on any other basis authorized by law.

Laws 1967, c. 143, § 5, p. 440.

In personam jurisdiction may be acquired over a nonresident defendant in a divorce action by extra-territorial personal service of process made in accordance with a statute of this state if there exists sufficient contacts between the defendant and this state relevant to the cause of action to satisfy traditional notions of fair play and substantive justice. In this case, defendant's last marital domicile was in Nebraska and no showing was made that it was later superseded by a new domicile. Stucky v. Stucky, 186 Neb. 636, 185 N.W.2d 656 (1971).